Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5405SV (3) 91 nls/ko S.F. 2217 Section 1. Section 536.13, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. After a licensee has approved a loan 3 to a borrower, the licensee may offer the borrower the option 4 to purchase an auto club membership or vehicle warranty. If 5 the licensee offers a borrower the option to purchase an auto 6 club membership or vehicle warranty, all of the following shall 7 apply: 8 a. The licensee shall inform the borrower, in a written 9 document initialed by the borrower, that the purchase of an 10 auto club membership or vehicle warranty is optional and 11 failure to purchase an auto club membership or vehicle warranty 12 will not affect the receipt of the loan by the borrower. 13 b. If the borrower chooses to purchase an auto club 14 membership or vehicle warranty the licensee shall permit the 15 borrower either to pay the cost of the auto club membership or 16 vehicle warranty with funds that are not the proceeds of the 17 loan, or to include the cost in the loan the borrower obtains 18 from the licensee. 19 c. A licensee shall permit a borrower to cancel an auto 20 club membership or vehicle warranty and to receive a full 21 refund of the purchase price at any time within thirty calendar 22 days following the date of purchase from the licensee if the 23 borrower has not used any service provided through the auto 24 club membership or vehicle warranty. 25